Hawaii statutes.
[§39C-2] Allocation of state bond ceiling.
(a) The department, with the approval of the governor, may allocate all or any
part of the state ceiling to any issuer for a specific calendar year or shorter
period. At the request of the department, any issuer to which any part of the
state ceiling has been allocated, and with respect to which bonds have not yet
been sold, shall return all or part of the allocation as the department has
requested, in which case the department shall provide for its reallocation.

(b) In the event allocations of the state
ceiling are made directly to issuers other than the State by federal statute or
by the United States Department of the Treasury or other federal authority,
including by requiring the State to make specified allocations, to the extent
permitted by federal law or procedure, the department may require or request
recipients of such allocations to report any plans the recipient may have to
use the allocation in the form and by a date as the department may specify and
to transfer to the State any allocation that the recipients do not plan to use
or which the department determines is not reasonably expected to be used, in
which case the department may provide for its reallocation.

(c) Any issuer may request of the department
an allocation or additional allocation of the state ceiling or transfer or
return all or any portion of its allocation of the state ceiling to the State.
[L 2011, c 33, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next